Georgia, session 2025_26, HB812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 8 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating
to state building, plumbing, and electrical codes, is amended by revising subsection (c) of
Code Section 8-2-25, relating to application of minimum standard codes, local adoption and
requirements, and exemptions, as follows:
H. B. 812
- 1 -

LC 59 0157
"(c)(1) In the event that the governing authority of any municipality or county finds that
the state minimum standard codes do not meet its needs, the local government may
provide requirements not less stringent than those specified in the state minimum
standard codes when such requirements are based on local climatic, geologic,
topographic, or public safety factors; provided, however, that there is a determination by
the local governing body of a need to amend the requirements of the state minimum
standard code based upon a demonstration by the local governing body that local
conditions justify such requirements not less stringent than those specified in the state
minimum standard codes for the protection of life and property. All such proposed
amendments shall be submitted by the local governing body to the department 60 days
prior to the adoption of such amendment. Concurrent with the submission of the
proposed amendment to the department, the local governing body shall submit in writing
the legislative findings of the governing body and such other documentation as the local
governing body deems helpful in justifying the proposed amendment. The department
shall review and comment on a proposed amendment. Such comment shall be in writing
and shall be sent to the submitting local government with a recommendation notice that:
(A) The That the proposed local amendment should shall not be adopted, due to the
lack of sufficient evidence to show that such proposed local amendment would be as
stringent as the state minimum standard codes and the lack of sufficient evidence to
show that local climatic, geologic, topographic, or public safety factors require such an
amendment; or
(B) The That the proposed local amendment should may be adopted, due to a
preponderance of evidence that such proposed local amendment would be as stringent
as the state minimum standard codes and a preponderance of evidence that the local
climatic, geologic, topographic, or public safety factors require such an amendment; or
(C) That the department has no recommendation regarding the adoption or disapproval
of the proposed local amendments, due to the lack of sufficient evidence to show that
H. B. 812
- 2 -

LC 59 0157
such proposed local amendment would or would not be as stringent as the state
minimum standard codes and the lack of sufficient evidence to show that local climatic,
geologic, topographic, or public safety factors require or do not require such an
amendment.
(2) The department shall have 60 days after receipt of a proposed local amendment to
review the proposed amendment and make a recommendation as set forth in
paragraph (1) of this subsection. In the event that the department fails to respond within
the time allotted, the local governing body may adopt the proposed local amendment.
(3) In the event that the department recommends against the adoption of the proposed
local amendment, a local governing body shall specifically vote to reject the department's
recommendations before any local amendment may be adopted.
(4)(3) No local amendment shall become effective until the local governing body has
caused a copy of the adopted amendment to be filed with the department. A copy of an
amendment shall be deemed to have been filed with the department when it has been
placed in the United States mail sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery,
return receipt requested.
(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to require approval by the
department before a local amendment shall become effective.
(6)(4) The department shall maintain a file of all amendments to the state minimum
standard codes adopted by the various municipalities and counties in the this state, which
information shall be made available to the public upon request. The department may
charge reasonable fees for copies of such information. An index of such amendments
shall be included in each new edition of a state minimum standard code.
(7)(5) At the time of issuing a building permit, the issuing county or municipality shall
notify the holder of the permit of any local amendments to the state minimum standard
codes which are in effect for that county or municipality and that any such amendments
are on file with the department. A county or municipality may satisfy this notice
H. B. 812
- 3 -

LC 59 0157
requirement by posting or providing a summary of the topic of such local amendment or
amendments and the address and telephone number of the department."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 7 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to control of soil
erosion and sedimentation, is amended by revising Code Section 12-7-9, relating to
applications for permits, erosion and sediment control plans and data, and time for issuance
or denial, as follows:
"12-7-9.
(a) Applications for permits shall be submitted in accordance with this chapter and the
rules and regulations, ordinances, and resolutions adopted pursuant to this chapter. Such
applications shall be accompanied by the applicant's erosion and sediment control plans
and by such supportive data as will affirmatively demonstrate that the land-disturbing
activity proposed will be carried out in such a manner that the minimum requirements set
forth in Code Section 12-7-6 shall be met. All applications shall contain a certification
stating that the plan preparer or the designee thereof his or her designee visited the site
prior to creation of the plan or that such a visit was not required in accordance with rules
and regulations established by the board.
(b) No permit shall be issued to any applicant unless the local issuing authority
affirmatively determines that the plan embracing such activities meets the requirements of
Code Section 12-7-6. All applicable fees shall be paid prior to issuance of the land
disturbance permit by the local issuing authority.
(c) Permits shall be issued or denied as soon as practicable after the application therefor
has been filed with the local issuing authority, but in any event not later than 45 days
thereafter after such filing. In the event that a permit has been denied or deemed not
accepted and the applicant thereafter resubmits the application in modified form to address
deficiencies identified in the stated reasons for denial or nonacceptance pursuant to
H. B. 812
- 4 -

LC 59 0157
subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-11, then the local issuing authority shall cause the
permit to be issued or denied as soon as practicable after such resubmission, but in any
event not later than 14 days after such resubmission.
(d) If a local issuing authority requires compliance with additional regulatory items by the
100 applicant beyond erosion and sediment control, including, but not limited to, storm-water
101 management, zoning, land use, or utility approvals, all such requirements shall be subject
102 to the review time frames imposed in subsection (c) of this Code section."
103 SECTION 3.
104 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 12-7-11, relating to statement of
105 reasons for denial of permit required, conditions for approval, and suspension, revocation,
106 or modification of permit, as follows:
107 "12-7-11.
108 (a) Within the time frames specified by Code Section 12-7-9, the local issuing authority
109 shall issue or deny the permit. The local issuing authority, upon denial of a permit, shall
110 state its reasons for the denial, setting forth specifically wherein where such application is
111 found to be deficient. No local issuing authority shall deny or deem not accepted a permit
112 for any reason that is not an authorized reason for denial or nonacceptance under local,
113 state, or federal law with which the application or plans do not comply. Concurrently with
114 denial or nonacceptance, the local issuing authority shall provide the applicant with a
115 written list of the reasons for such denial or nonacceptance and a citation to the local, state,
116 or federal law supporting each reason for the denial or nonacceptance. Should the
117 applicant make material additions to the resubmitted application that are unrelated to the
118 cited reasons for the denial or nonacceptance of the original application, the local issuing
119 authority may also address such additions in reviewing the resubmitted application. Any
120 land-disturbing activity permitted under this chapter shall be carried out in accordance with
121 this chapter and the ordinance, resolution, or rules and regulations adopted and
H. B. 812
- 5 -

LC 59 0157
122 promulgated pursuant to this chapter. The local issuing authority shall specify on the
123 permit the conditions under which the activity may be undertaken.
124 (b) The permit may be suspended, revoked, or modified by the local issuing authority, as
125 to all or any portion of the land affected by the plan, upon a finding that the holder or his
126 or her successor in title is not in compliance with the approved erosion and sediment
127 control plan or that the holder or his or her successor in title is in violation of this chapter
128 or any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation adopted or promulgated pursuant to this
129 chapter. A holder of a permit shall notify any successor in title to him or her as to all or
130 any portion of the land affected by the approved plan of the conditions contained in the
131 permit."
132 SECTION 4.
133 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 812
- 6 -